Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 121
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see §§ 7-90-102 and 7-121-401.

Law reviews:

For article, "An Overview of the

C

olorado Revised Nonprofit

C

orporation Act", see 26 Colo. Law. 5 (Sept. 1997); for article, "A Survey of the Law of Colorado Nonprofit Entities", see 27 Colo. Law. 5 (April 1998); for article, "Colorado Choice of Entity 1998", see 27 Colo. Law. 5 (June 1998); for article, "Colorado LLCs as Nonprofit Organizations", see 27 Colo. Law. 57 (Aug. 1998); for article, "Colorado Choice of Form of Organization and Structure 2001", see 30 Colo. Law. 11 (Oct. 2001); for article, "Entity and Trade Name Registration: 2001 Update", see 30 Colo. Law. 81 (Oct. 2001); for article, "No Paper Required: Business Entity Legislation Makes Life Easier for Business Lawyers", see 33 Colo. Law. 6 (June 2004); for article, "Entity and Trade Name Registration: 2004 Update", see 34 Colo. Law. 11 (Jan. 2005).

Section

PART 1 SHORT TITLE AND
RESERVATION OF POWER

PART 2 FILING DOCUMENTS

PART 3 SECRETARY OF STATE

PART 4 DEFINITIONS

PART 5 PRIVATE FOUNDATIONS

PART 6 JUDICIAL RELIEF